District of Columbia statutes.
2-221.06

Determination of receipt and payment dates; construction of rental contracts.

(a)

An invoice shall be deemed to have been received by an agency on (1) the date on which the agency’s designated payment office actually receives a proper invoice, or (2) the date on which the agency accepts the property or service concerned, whichever is later.

(b)

(1)

District agencies shall mail or otherwise deliver checks to a business concern on or about the same day that the checks are dated.

(2)

If a District agency makes a payment by check on or about same day as the date of the check, then the payment shall be considered made on the date on which a check for payment is dated.

(c)

A contract for the rental of real or personal property is a contract for the acquisition of that property.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-164, § 7, 32 DCR 555
1981 Ed., § 1-1176.